Indiana, session 2026, SB207.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-43-4-2.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.8. (a) This section does not apply to the following:
(1) A law enforcement officer acting within the scope of the
officer's duties.
(2) An employee of a:
(A) new motor vehicle dealer (as defined in
IC 9-32-2.1-32);
(B) used motor vehicle dealer (as defined in
IC 9-32-2.1-44);
(C) distributor (as defined in IC 9-13-2-45);
(D) manufacturer (as defined in IC 9-13-2-97);
(E) recreational vehicle dealer (as defined in
IC 9-32-19-13);
(F) recreational vehicle distributor (as defined in
IC 9-32-19-15);
(G) recreational vehicle manufacturer (as defined in
2026 IN 207—LS 6741/DI 151


IC 9-32-19-16);
(H) locksmith; or
(I) manufacturer of a motor vehicle key programming
device that is under contract for sale only to entities listed
in clauses (A) through (H);
acting within the scope of the employee's duties.
(b) As used in this section, "motor vehicle key programming
device" means a computer program, a device, an application, or a
software program designed to:
(1) intercept communications of; or
(2) electronically communicate with;
a motor vehicle for the purpose of emulating a motor vehicle key.
The term includes an emulating device and a relay attack device.
(c) A person may not do any of the following:
(1) Manufacture, offer for sale, market, transfer, or sell a
motor vehicle key programming device.
(2) Possess, use, or operate a motor vehicle key programming
device.
(d) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection
(c) commits unlawful use of a motor vehicle key programming
device, a Class A misdemeanor.
2026 IN 207—LS 6741/DI 151